Massachusetts, session 194th, H829.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
ORDERED, that the Town Council assembled votes to amend the Bridgewater Home
Rule Charter, Article II, Section 2-12 and to send said amendment to the State Legislature as a
Special Act as follows:
Section 2-12(b) shall be deleted in its entirety and replaced with the following:
(b) Term Limits –
(1) No person shall be eligible to be elected or appointed as a District Council member of
the Town Council if, at any point during the term of office for which the person may be elected
or appointed, the service of the eligible person would exceed four District Councilor elections
terms or appointments to the Town Council.
(2) No person shall be eligible to be elected or appointed as an At-large Council member
of the Town Council if, at any point during the term of office for which the person may be
of 2

elected or appointed, the service of the eligible person would exceed four elections terms or
appointments to the Town Council.
(3) For the purpose of this section, prior service as an At-Large Councilor shall not
prevent seeking election as a District Councilor. Prior service as a District Councilor shall not
prevent seeking election as an At-Large Councilor.
(4) A term lasting less than 24 months shall not be included in calculating the total
number of terms served by a member of the Town Council.
Said Amendment shall only become effective and is contingent upon approval by the
Town Council, the State Legislature and the voters of the Town of Bridgewater.
of 2